North Carolina, session 2025, HB218.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 20-7 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-7. Issuance and renewal of drivers licenses.
…
(b1) Application. – To obtain an identification card, learners permit, or drivers license
from the Division, a person shall complete an application form provided by the Division, present
at least two forms of identification approved by the Commissioner, be a resident of this State,
and, except for an identification card, demonstrate his or her physical and mental ability to drive
safely a motor vehicle included in the class of license for which the person has applied. At least
one of the forms of identification shall indicate the applicant's residence address. The Division
may copy the identification presented or hold it for a brief period of time to verify its authenticity.
To obtain an endorsement, a person shall demonstrate his or her physical and mental ability to
drive safely the type of motor vehicle for which the endorsement is required.
The application form shall request all of the following information, and it shall contain the
disclosures concerning the request for an applicant's social security number required by section
7 of the federal Privacy Act of 1974, Pub. L. No. 93-579:
…
(5a) The applicant's emergency contact information. Provision of this information
by the applicant shall be optional.
…
(f) Duration and Renewal of Licenses. – Drivers licenses shall be issued and renewed
pursuant to the provisions of this subsection:
…
(3a) When to renew. – A person may apply to the Division to renew a license
during the 180-day period before the license expires. The Division may not
accept an application for renewal made before the 180-day period begins. A
renewal application shall include an optional request for the applicant to
provide updated emergency contact information.
…."
*H218-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective October 1, 2026, and applies to applications
submitted on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 218-First Edition